North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-58 Naturopaths

43-58-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Approved naturopathic medical college” means a college and program granting the degree of doctor of naturopathy or naturopathic medicine which must require as a minimum a four-year, full-time resident program of academic and clinical study and which:

Is accredited, or has the status of candidate for accreditation, by an organization approved by the board, such as the council on naturopathic medical education; or

Has been approved by the board after an investigation that determines that the college or program meets education standards equivalent to those established by the accrediting agency under subdivision a and complies with the board’s rules.

“Board” means the state board of integrative health care created under chapter 43-57.

“Homeopathic preparations” means nonprescriptive substances prepared according to the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States. The term does not include prescriptive drugs.

“Licensee” means an individual licensed by the board under this chapter.

“Naturopath” means an individual licensed to practice naturopathic health care under this chapter.

“Naturopathic health care”, “naturopathic medicine”, or “naturopathy” means a system of primary health care practiced by naturopaths for the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of human health conditions, injury, and disease. The purpose of naturopathic health care, naturopathic medicine, or naturopathy is to promote or restore health by the support and stimulation of the individual’s inherent self-healing processes. This is accomplished through education of the patient by a naturopath and through the use of natural therapies and therapeutic substances.

“Naturopathic physical application” means the therapeutic use by a naturopath of the actions or devices of electrical muscle stimulation, galvanic, diathermy, ultrasound, ultraviolet light, hydrotherapy, and naturopathic manipulative therapy. The term does not include manipulation of the spine.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

Collateral References.

Liability of chiropractors and other drugless practitioners for medical malpractice, 77 A.L.R.4th 273.

43-58-02.
Exemptions.

Many of the therapies used by a naturopath, such as the use of nutritional supplements, herbs, foods, homeopathic preparations, and such physical forces as heat, cold, water, touch, and light, are not the exclusive privilege of naturopaths, and their use, practice, prescription, or administration by individuals not licensed to practice naturopathic medicine is not prohibited by this chapter. This chapter does not restrict or apply to the scope of practice of any other profession licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

43-58-03.
License required — Title restrictions.

Effective January 1, 2012, a person may not practice naturopathy without a current naturopathic license issued by the board.

A naturopath may use the title “naturopath” or “doctor of naturopathic medicine” and the abbreviation “N.D.” when used to reflect either of these titles. Effective January 1, 2012, a person that uses these terms or initials as identification without having received a naturopathic license under this chapter is engaging in the practice of naturopathy without a license.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

43-58-04.
Qualifications for licensure.

In order to obtain a license to practice naturopathic medicine in this state, an application must be made to the board. The application must be upon the form adopted by the board and must be made in the manner prescribed by the board.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

43-58-05.
Application for licensure.

An applicant for naturopathic licensure shall file an application on forms provided by the board showing to the board’s satisfaction that the applicant is of good moral character and satisfied all of the requirements of this chapter and chapter 43-57, including:

Successful graduation of an approved naturopathic medical college;

Successful completion of an examination prescribed or endorsed by the board, such as part I and part II of the naturopathic physicians licensing examinations;

Physical, mental, and professional capability for the practice of naturopathic medicine in a manner acceptable to the board; and

A history free of any finding by the board, any other state licensure board, or any court of competent jurisdiction of the commission of any act that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action under this chapter and chapter 43-57. The board may modify this restriction for cause.

The application must be accompanied by the board-established license fees and application fees and by the documents, affidavits, and certificates necessary to establish that the applicant possesses the necessary qualifications.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

43-58-06.
Initial applications — Education and testing exception.

Notwithstanding the education and examination requirements for licensure under subdivisions a and b of subsection 1 of section 43-58-05, if an applicant was a bona fide resident of the state from January 1, 2011, through December 31, 2011, was practicing naturopathic medicine in this state immediately preceding January 1, 2012, was required to apply for licensure under this chapter in order to continue that practice, and does not meet the educational or examination requirements or both, the board may issue a license or limited license to that applicant if, following an examination of the applicant’s education and experience, the board determines the applicant has sufficient education and experience to prepare the applicant to practice naturopathic medicine.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

43-58-07.
Licensure granted without examination to individuals licensed in other states.

The board may issue a naturopathic license by endorsement to an applicant who has complied with licensure requirements and who has passed an examination given by a recognized certifying agency approved by the licensing agency if the board determines the examination was equivalent in every respect to the examination required under this chapter.

The board may enter reciprocal agreements with licensing agencies of other states providing for reciprocal waiver of further examination or any part of the examination.

If an applicant is exempt from the examination required under this chapter, the applicant shall comply with the other requirements for licensure. The board may adopt rules allowing for temporary and special licensure to be in effect during the interval between board meetings.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

43-58-08.
Practice of naturopathic health care.

A naturopath may practice naturopathic medicine as a limited practice of the healing arts as exempted under section 43-17-02. A naturopath may not:

Prescribe, dispense, or administer any prescription drug;

Administer ionizing radioactive substances for therapeutic purposes;

Perform a surgical procedure; or

Claim to practice any licensed health care profession or system of treatment other than naturopathic medicine unless holding a separate license in that profession. A naturopath may not hold out to the public that the naturopath is a primary care provider.

A naturopath may prescribe and administer for preventive and therapeutic purposes a prescriptive device and the following nonprescriptive natural therapeutic substances, drugs, and therapies:

Food, vitamins, minerals, dietary supplements, enzymes, botanical medicines, and homeopathic preparations;

Topical drugs, health care counseling, nutritional counseling and dietary therapy, naturopathic physical applications, and therapeutic devices; and

Barrier devices for contraception.

A naturopath may perform or order for diagnostic purposes a physical or orificial examination, ultrasound, phlebotomy, clinical laboratory test or examination, physiological function test, and any other noninvasive diagnostic procedure commonly used by physicians in general practice and as authorized by the board.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

43-58-09.
Public health duties.

A naturopath has the same powers and duties as a licensed physician with regard to public health laws, reportable diseases and conditions, communicable disease control and prevention, recording of vital statistics, health and physical examinations, and local boards of health, except that the authority and responsibility are limited to activities consistent with the scope of practice established under this chapter and chapter 43-57.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.

43-58-10.
Employment by hospitals.

A hospital may employ a naturopath in the same manner as provided under section 43-17-42.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 331, § 4.